Oklahoma, session 2025, SB801.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Medicine Injury Justice Act”.


B. The Legislature of the State of Oklahoma finds and declares


the following:


1. State Sovereignty: The Tenth Amendment to the United States


Constitution reserves to the states all powers not explicitly



Req. No. 1352 Page 1


delegated to the federal government, including the authority to


regulate health and safety within state borders;


2. Protection of Citizens: It is the responsibility of the


State of Oklahoma to protect its citizens from harm caused by


pharmaceutical products, and the state asserts its sovereign


authority to ensure accountability for those responsible;


3. Federal Overreach: Federal immunity statutes including, but


not limited to, the National Childhood Vaccine Injury Act of 1986,


the Public Readiness and Emergency Preparedness (PREP) Act of 2005,


the Project Bioshield Act of 2004, and the Defense Production Act of


1950, which may interfere with the rights of Oklahoma citizens to


seek justice in state courts and deprive them of adequate remedies


for harm, which in many cases is very serious or even deadly;


4. Justice and Accountability: No individual or corporation,


including pharmaceutical companies, should be shielded from


liability for harm caused by their actions or products;


5. Right to Remedy: Article II, Section 6 of the Oklahoma


Constitution guarantees that “The courts of justice of the State


shall be open to every person, and speedy and certain remedy


afforded for every wrong and for every injury to person, property,


or reputation; and right and justice shall be administered without


sale, denial, delay, or prejudice.” This act ensures that the


constitutional rights of Oklahoma citizens are preserved in all


claims related to pharmaceutical harm; and

Req. No. 1352 Page 2


6. Legislative Duty: This act is a necessary and proper


exercise of Oklahoma’s sovereign authority to preserve the health,


safety, and welfare of its people.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9001 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Fraud” means a deliberate and intentional act to deceive


another party by misrepresenting, concealing, or omitting a material


fact to the detriment of the deceived party; and


2. “Gross negligence” means a conscious, voluntary act or


omission in reckless disregard of the duty of care, resulting in a


substantial and unjustifiable risk of harm to another, which a


reasonable person would consider a gross deviation from acceptable


standards of conduct.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9001.1 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. Any pharmaceutical company whose products are proven to


directly cause harm to an Oklahoma citizen shall be directly liable


in Oklahoma state courts for:


a. compensatory damages including medical expenses, lost


wages, and other economic losses,


b. noneconomic damages including pain and suffering, and

Req. No. 1352 Page 3


c. punitive damages in cases of gross negligence or


fraud.


2. Pharmaceutical companies may be criminally prosecuted for


gross negligence, fraudulent concealment, reckless disregard for


safety, or intentional harm.


B. 1. Immunity granted under federal statutes including, but


not limited to, the National Childhood Vaccine Injury Act of 1986,


the Public Readiness and Emergency Preparedness (PREP) Act of 2005,


the Project Bioshield Act of 2004, and the Defense Production Act of


1950 shall not apply to claims brought in Oklahoma state courts.


2. Oklahoma asserts its jurisdiction under Article II, Section


of the Oklahoma Constitution and the Tenth Amendment to the


Constitution of the United States to ensure justice for its


citizens.


C. 1. Oklahoma citizens harmed by pharmaceutical products have


the right to due process under Article II, Section 7 of the Oklahoma


Constitution.


2. All claims shall be heard in Oklahoma state courts, with no


requirement for arbitration or other limitations on access to


justice.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9001.2 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 1352 Page 4


To the extent any laws conflict with this act, this act shall


govern.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1352 DC 1/19/2025 5:43:36 AM































Req. No. 1352 Page 5